Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-108
Books; sale, exchange, disposal; authorization.

The directors may authorize the sale, exchange, or disposal of any surplus, damaged, defective, obsolete, or duplicate books in the library and surplus or obsolete books, reports, or pamphlets which are for sale or distribution by the librarian.

Laws 1871, § 13, p. 54;

R.S.1913, § 3786;

C.S.1922, § 3179;

Laws 1929, c. 64, § 2, p. 241;

C.S.1929, § 51-108;

R.S.1943, § 51-108;

Laws 1957, c. 222, § 1, p. 764.